Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1273.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; pavement rehabilitation; Olga Frontage Road The sum of $14,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation for pavement rehabilitation of Olga Frontage Road between Bowie and San Simon.